Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Northern Kentucky Convention Center

154.90-005.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that a major convention center in Northern Kentucky will serve as a catalyst in the regional development of commerce, and that it will enhance the position of Northern Kentucky as a year round convention and tourist attraction. The General Assembly finds further that the development and governance of a Northern Kentucky convention center is a public purpose of the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 99, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

154.90-010.
Northern Kentucky Convention Center Corporation — Board.

The Northern Kentucky Convention Center Corporation is hereby established to develop and manage the Northern Kentucky Convention Center. The corporation shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes. The corporation shall be directed by a board consisting of seven (7) members appointed as follows:

The county judge/executives of Kenton, Campbell and Boone Counties, with the approval of their respective fiscal courts, shall each appoint one (1) member to the board. An appointee under this subsection shall have demonstrated successful business experience in a field related to the convention business;

The mayor of the city within which the convention center is located shall appoint one (1) member, with the approval of the city commission; and

The Governor shall appoint three (3) members.

One (1) of the initial appointees of the Governor shall have a one (1) year term, one (1) shall have a two (2) year term, and one (1) shall have a three (3) year term. All other appointments, and all subsequent appointments by the Governor, shall be for four (4) year terms.

Members may be removed by the appointing authority only for cause and after being afforded notice, a hearing, and a finding of fact by the appointing authority. A copy of charges, transcript of the record of the hearings, and findings of fact shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

The Northern Kentucky Convention Center Corporation shall be a body corporate with full corporate powers. A quorum of the corporation shall consist of four (4) members, with a majority of members present authorized to act upon any matter legally before the corporation. Minutes and records shall be kept of all meetings of the corporation and all official actions shall be recorded.

The corporation may enact bylaws concerning the election of officers and other administrative procedures it deems necessary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 152, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 42, effective June 25, 2009.

154.90-015.
Powers and duties of corporation.

The Northern Kentucky Convention Center Corporation:

Shall supervise the design and construction of the Northern Kentucky Convention Center, and shall provide all management functions for the facility and for any other property acquired or leased pursuant to its powers under this section;

May take, acquire, and hold property, and all interests therein, by deed, purchase, gift, devise, bequest, or lease, or by transfer from the State Property and Buildings Commission, and may dispose of any property so acquired in any manner provided by law.

May issue revenue bonds, subject to procedures which shall be established by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, solely payable from the revenues and other funds pledged for their payment for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any project or for the acquisition of property;

Shall promote the growth and development of the convention trade, tourism, and the hotel, restaurant, and entertainment industry in Northern Kentucky and the Commonwealth, through utilization of the Northern Kentucky Convention Center to enhance these and the public interest;

May adopt administrative regulations, as provided in KRS Chapter 13A, governing the operation, maintenance, or use of property under its custody and control;

May levy a surcharge on tickets for functions held within the center to contribute to operating revenue;

Shall have the exclusive control of all exhibitions, performances, and concessions in the Northern Kentucky Convention Center. The corporation shall have a prior lien upon the property of any private exhibitor, concessionaire, or other person holding an exhibition or performance or operating a concession in the center, and may sell the property upon ten (10) days notice to satisfy any indebtedness:

Shall participate with local hotels and the travel industry to develop tourist packages and additional services to attract conferences and conventions to the region;

May establish an executive committee from among its membership with full authority to act between its meetings to the extent delegated by the corporation; and

May sue and be sued and maintain and defend legal actions in its corporate name.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 99, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

154.90-020.
Executive director — Use of revenues — Annual audit.

The Northern Kentucky Convention Center Corporation may appoint an executive director, who shall hold office at its pleasure. The executive director shall act under the direction of the board of the corporation in employing necessary staff to perform its duties and exercise its powers as assigned by KRS 154.90-015.

The executive director shall keep all minutes, records, and orders of the corporation, and shall be responsible for the preservation of all the documents, which are public records subject to KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

All revenues derived by the corporation from the use of the Northern Kentucky Convention Center, or contributions to the Northern Kentucky Convention Center from other sources as authorized in KRS 154.90-015 shall be used solely to defray the expenses of the Northern Kentucky Convention Center, including payment on debt; the cost of management and operation of its facilities; the creation of an adequate reserve for repair, replacement, debt service, and capital improvements; the procurance of insurance; and promotional activities. Any additional revenues derived by the corporation from any other source shall similarly be used solely for the purposes enumerated in this section. An annual audit of all funds of the corporation and its affiliated entities, if any, shall be made by the State Auditor of Public Accounts, and reported to the Governor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 99, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.